Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB333.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.417 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall issue to any felony offender, if the felony offender
is eligible, released from the Kentucky Department of Corrections, a county jail or
other local or regional correctional facility,[ if and when funds are available,] or a
Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Kentucky on home incarceration,
parole, completed service of sentence, shock probation, or pardon, a personal
identification card or, if the felony offender is eligible, an operator's license. An
offender who wishes to obtain a personal identification card or operator's license
shall provide proper documentation to comply with the provisions of this section.
(2) Proper documentation under subsection (1) of this section shall consist of:
(a) The offender's certificate of birth;
(b) A copy of the offender's resident record card and parole certificate or notice of
discharge;
(c) A photograph of the offender, printed on plastic card or paper; and
(d) A release letter that shall contain the offender's:
1. Full legal name, subject to the information available to the Kentucky
Department of Corrections or a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility
located in Kentucky;
2. Discharge or [/]release date;
3. Signature;
4. Social Security number;
5. Date of birth;
6. Present Kentucky address where he or she resides; and
7. Physical description.
(3) The Transportation Cabinet shall issue to any felony offender, if the felony offender
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/14/2025 1:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1251
is eligible, probated or conditionally discharged by the court and under the
supervision of the Division of Probation and Parole or the United States Probation
Office, a personal identification card or, if the felony offender is eligible, an
operator's license. An offender who wishes to obtain a personal identification card
or operator's license shall provide proper documentation to comply with the
provisions of this section.
(4) Proper documentation under subsection (3) of this section shall consist of:
(a) The offender's certificate of birth;
(b) The offender's sentencing order;
(c) A photograph of the offender, printed on plastic card or paper; and
(d) A notarized release letter, signed by the supervising officer verifying the
offender's status on supervision, that shall contain the offender's:
1. Full legal name, subject to the information available to the Division of
Probation and Parole or the United States Probation Office;
2. Signature;
3. Social Security number;
4. Date of birth;
5. Present Kentucky address where he or she resides; and
6. Physical description.
(5) The offender shall present the documentation identified in subsection (2) or (4) of
this section to the cabinet within thirty (30) calendar days from the date of the
release letter and shall be responsible for paying the fee for the personal
identification card or operator's license pursuant to KRS 186.531.
(6) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish procedures for current inmates in
state and federal prisons, who are deemed eligible by prison officials, to be issued
operator's licenses to engage in work release activities or reentry initiatives. The
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/14/2025 1:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1251
administrative regulations shall address, at a minimum:
(a) The information required for application, which shall include all information
in paragraph (b) of this subsection which is germane to a current inmate. For
purposes of this paragraph, the facility in which the inmate is housed shall be
considered the inmate's residence;
(b) Required documentation from the Department of Corrections or the Federal
Bureau of Prisons that the inmate meets the security criteria to be eligible for
work outside of the facility;
(c) Procedures for license issuance; and
(d) Restrictions on use of the license, including a requirement that the inmate
shall surrender the license to prison officials when the inmate is not engaged
in work outside the facility.
(7) The cabinet shall process applications for operator's licenses and personal
identification cards under this section in the same manner as in KRS 186.412 and
186.4122.
(8) The Transportation Cabinet may enter into an agreement with the Kentucky
Department of Corrections, the United States Probation Office, or the Federal
Bureau of Prisons to use a mobile unit to begin the issuance process in this section.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/14/2025 1:54 PM Jacketed